Illinois, session 104th, HB2408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Arbitration Act is amended by 5changing Sections 6 and 17 and by adding Sections 1.1, 2.1, 62.2, 2.3, and 2.4 as follows: 7    (710 ILCS 5/1.1 new)8    Sec. 1.1. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Consumer" means an individual who seeks, uses, or 10acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods or services for 11personal, family, or household purposes. 12    "Employee" means any current employee, former employee, or 13applicant for employment. "Employee" includes any person who 14is, was, or who claims to have misclassified as an independent 15contractor or otherwise improperly placed into a category 16other than employee or applicant for employment.  17    (710 ILCS 5/2.1 new)18    Sec. 2.1. Notice of intention to arbitrate. A party may 19serve upon another party a demand for arbitration or a notice 20of intention to arbitrate, specifying the agreement under 21which arbitration is sought and the name and address of the 22party serving the notice, or of an officer or agent if the   HB2408- 2 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1party is an association or corporation, and stating that 2unless the party served applies to stay the arbitration within 320 days after service the party shall be precluded from 4objecting that a valid agreement was not made or has not been 5complied with and from asserting in court the bar of a 6limitation of time. Notice or demand shall be served in the 7same manner as a summons or by registered or certified mail, 8return receipt requested. An application to stay arbitration 9must be made by the party served within 20 days after service 10upon the party of the notice or demand or the party shall be so 11precluded. Notice of such application shall be served in the 12same manner as a summons or by registered or certified mail, 13return receipt requested. Service of the application may be 14made upon the adverse party or upon the adverse party's 15attorney if the attorney's name appears on the demand for 16arbitration or the notice of intention to arbitrate. Service 17of the application by mail shall be timely if the application 18is posted within the prescribed period. Any provision in an 19arbitration agreement or arbitration rules which waives the 20right to apply for a stay of arbitration or proscribes a manner 21of notifying a party of an intention to commence arbitration 22that is more burdensome than that described in this Section is 23null and void. 24    (710 ILCS 5/2.2 new)25    Sec. 2.2. Fees and costs of arbitration initiation;   HB2408- 3 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1invoice; breach of agreement; sanctions. 2    (a) In an arbitration brought by a consumer or employee 3that requires, either expressly or through application of 4State or federal law or the rules of the arbitrator, the 5drafting party to pay certain fees and costs before the 6arbitration can proceed, if the fees or costs to initiate an 7arbitration proceeding are not paid within 30 days after the 8due date, the drafting party is in material breach of the 9arbitration agreement, is in default of the arbitration, and 10waives its right to compel arbitration under Section 2.11    After an employee or consumer meets the filing 12requirements necessary to initiate an arbitration, the 13arbitrator shall immediately provide an invoice for any fees 14and costs required before the arbitration can proceed to all 15of the parties to the arbitration. The invoice shall be 16provided in its entirety, shall state the full amount owed and 17the date that payment is due, and shall be sent to all parties 18by the same means on the same day. To avoid delay, absent an 19express provision in the arbitration agreement stating the 20number of days in which the parties to the arbitration must pay 21any required fees or costs, the arbitrator shall issue all 22invoices to the parties as due upon receipt. 23    (b) If the drafting party materially breaches the 24arbitration agreement and is in default under subsection (a), 25the employee or consumer may: 26        (1) withdraw the claim from arbitration and proceed in   HB2408- 4 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1    a court of appropriate jurisdiction; or 2        (2) compel arbitration in which the drafting party 3    shall pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs related to 4    the arbitration. 5    (c) If the employee or consumer withdraws the claim from 6arbitration and proceeds with an action in a court of 7appropriate jurisdiction under paragraph (1) of subsection 8(b), the statute of limitations with regard to all claims 9brought or that relate back to any claim brought in 10arbitration shall be tolled as of the date of the first filing 11of a claim in a court, arbitration forum, or other dispute 12resolution forum. 13    (d) If the employee or consumer proceeds with an action in 14a court of appropriate jurisdiction, the court shall impose 15sanctions on the drafting party in accordance with Section 162.4.  17    (710 ILCS 5/2.3 new)18    Sec. 2.3. Fees and costs of arbitration continuance; 19invoice; breach of agreement; sanctions. 20    (a) In an arbitration brought by a consumer or employee, 21either expressly or through application of State or federal 22law or the rules of the arbitrator, that the drafting party pay 23certain fees and costs during the pendency of an arbitration 24proceeding, if the fees or costs required to continue the 25arbitration proceeding are not paid within 30 days after the   HB2408- 5 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1due date, the drafting party is in material breach of the 2arbitration agreement, is in default of the arbitration, and 3waives its right to compel the employee or consumer to proceed 4with that arbitration as a result of the material breach.5    The arbitrator shall provide an invoice for any fees and 6costs required for the arbitration proceeding to continue to 7all of the parties to the arbitration. The invoice shall be 8provided in its entirety, shall state the full amount owed and 9the date that payment is due, and shall be sent to all parties 10by the same means on the same day. To avoid delay, absent an 11express provision in the arbitration agreement stating the 12number of days in which the parties to the arbitration must pay 13any required fees or costs, the arbitrator shall issue all 14invoices to the parties as due upon receipt. Any extension of 15time for the due date shall be agreed upon by all parties. 16    (b) If the drafting party materially breaches the 17arbitration agreement and is in default under subsection (a), 18the employee or consumer may unilaterally elect to:19        (1) withdraw the claim from arbitration and proceed in 20    a court of appropriate jurisdiction. If the employee or 21    consumer withdraws the claim from arbitration and proceeds 22    with an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction, the 23    statute of limitations with regard to all claims brought 24    or that relate back to any claim brought in arbitration 25    shall be tolled as of the date of the first filing of a 26    claim in any court, arbitration forum, or other dispute   HB2408- 6 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1    resolution forum;2        (2) continue the arbitration proceeding, if the 3    arbitrator agrees to continue administering the 4    proceeding, notwithstanding the drafting party's failure 5    to pay fees or costs. The neutral arbitrator may institute 6    a collection action at the conclusion of the arbitration 7    proceeding against the drafting party that is in default 8    of the arbitration for payment of all fees associated with 9    the arbitration proceeding brought by a consumer or 10    employee, including the cost of administering any 11    proceedings after the default;12        (3) petition the court for an order compelling the 13    drafting party to pay all arbitration fees that the 14    drafting party is obligated to pay under the arbitration 15    agreement or the rules of the arbitrator;16        (4) pay the drafting party's fees and proceed with the 17    arbitration proceeding. As part of the award, the employee 18    or consumer shall recover all arbitration fees paid on 19    behalf of the drafting party without regard to any 20    findings on the merits in the underlying arbitration; or21        (5) if the employee or consumer withdraws the claim 22    from arbitration and proceeds in a court of appropriate 23    jurisdiction under paragraph (1), both of the following 24    apply:25            (A) The employee or consumer may bring a motion, 26        or a separate action, to recover all attorney's fees   HB2408- 7 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1        and all costs associated with the abandoned 2        arbitration proceeding. 3            (B) The recovery of arbitration fees, interest, 4        and related attorney's fees shall be without regard to 5        any findings on the merits in the underlying action or 6        arbitration. 7    The court shall impose sanctions on the drafting party in 8accordance with Section 2.4. 9    (c) If the employee or consumer continues in arbitration 10under paragraphs (2) through (4) of subsection (b), the 11arbitrator shall impose appropriate sanctions on the drafting 12party, including monetary sanctions, issue sanctions, evidence 13sanctions, or terminating sanctions. 14    (710 ILCS 5/2.4 new)15    Sec. 2.4. Breach of arbitration agreement; monetary 16sanctions; additional sanctions. 17    (a) The court shall impose a monetary sanction against a 18drafting party that materially breaches an arbitration 19agreement pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 2.2 or 20subsection (a) of Section 2.3, by ordering the drafting party 21to pay the reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees and 22costs, incurred by the employee or consumer as a result of the 23material breach.24    (b) In addition to the monetary sanction described in 25subsection (a), the court may order any of the following   HB2408- 8 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1sanctions against a drafting party that materially breaches an 2arbitration agreement under subsection (a) of Section 2.2 or 3subsection (a) of Section 2.3, unless the court finds that the 4one subject to the sanction acted with substantial 5justification or that other circumstances make the imposition 6of the sanction unjust:7        (1) an evidence sanction by an order prohibiting the 8    drafting party from conducting discovery in the civil 9    action;10        (2) a terminating sanction by:11            (A) an order striking out the pleadings or parts 12        of the pleadings of the drafting party; or13            (B) an order rendering a judgment by default 14        against the drafting party; or15        (3) a contempt sanction by an order treating the 16    drafting party as in contempt of court. 17    (710 ILCS 5/6)  (from Ch. 10, par. 106)18    Sec. 6. Representation by attorney. 19    A party has the right to be represented by an attorney at 20any proceeding or hearing under this Act. A waiver thereof 21prior to the proceeding or hearing is ineffective. If a party 22is represented by an attorney, papers to be served on the party 23shall be served upon the attorney for that party. Any 24agreement which discriminates against or penalizes a party for 25retaining the services of counsel in an arbitration is null   HB2408- 9 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1and void. 2(Source: Laws 1961, p. 3844.) 3    (710 ILCS 5/17)  (from Ch. 10, par. 117)4    Sec. 17. Venue. 5    (a) An initial application shall be made to the court of 6the county in which the agreement provides the arbitration 7hearing shall be held or, if the hearing has been held, in the 8county in which it was held. Otherwise the application shall 9be made in the county where the adverse party resides or has a 10place of business or, if he has no residence or place of 11business in this State, to the court of any county. All 12subsequent applications shall be made to the court hearing the 13initial application unless the court otherwise directs.14    (b) If the name of the county is not specified, the 15application shall be brought in the county where the party 16seeking arbitration resides or is doing business, and other 17proceedings affecting arbitration are to be brought in the 18county where at least one of the parties resides or is doing 19business or where the arbitration was held or is pending. 20    (c) If there are multiple parties seeking arbitration 21against the same party or parties, the proceeding may be 22brought in any court and county where any of the parties 23seeking arbitration resides or is doing business or where the 24arbitration was held or is pending. All subsequent 25applications shall be made to the court hearing the initial   HB2408- 10 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1application unless the court otherwise directs. 2    (d) If there is no county in which the proceeding may be 3brought under this Section, the proceeding may be brought in 4any county. 5(Source: Laws 1961, p. 3844.)  HB2408- 11 -LRB104 09755 HLH 19821 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    710 ILCS 5/1.1 new4    710 ILCS 5/2.1 new5    710 ILCS 5/2.2 new6    710 ILCS 5/2.3 new7    710 ILCS 5/2.4 new8    710 ILCS 5/6from Ch. 10, par. 1069    710 ILCS 5/17from Ch. 10, par. 117